Florida, session 2026, HB35.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. This act may be cited as "Isaiah's Law."
Section 2. Paragraphs (e) and (f) of subsection (1) of
section 322.264, Florida Statutes, are amended, and paragraph
(g) is added to that subsection, to read:
322.264 "Habitual traffic offender" defined.—A "habitual
traffic offender" is any person whose record, as maintained by
the Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles, shows that
such person has accumulated the specified number of convictions
for offenses described in subsection (1) or subsection (2)
within a 5-year period:
(1) Three or more convictions of any one or more of the
following offenses arising out of separate acts:
(e) Failing to stop and render aid as required under the
laws of this state in the event of a motor vehicle crash
resulting in the death or personal injury of another; or
(f) Driving a commercial motor vehicle while his or her
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb35 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 35 2026 Legislature
privilege is disqualified; or
(g) Driving a motor vehicle without a valid license in
violation of s. 322.03.

Any violation of any federal law, any law of another state or
country, or any valid ordinance of a municipality or county of
another state similar to a statutory prohibition specified in
subsection (1) or subsection (2) shall be counted as a violation
of such prohibition. In computing the number of convictions, all
convictions during the 5 years previous to July 1, 1972, will be
used, provided at least one conviction occurs after that date.
The fact that previous convictions may have resulted in
suspension, revocation, or disqualification under another
section does not exempt them from being used for suspension or
revocation under this section as a habitual offender.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb35 -01-er